Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-740
Probate; disqualification of judge.

No judge of probate shall act in any case or matter where he is next of kin to the deceased, nor where he is legatee or devisee under a will, nor where he is named as executor or trustee in a will, or is one of the subscribing witnesses thereto, nor where he is related to any party in interest in any case before him, by consanguinity or affinity, or has such an interest therein as would exclude him from acting as a juror in such case or matter, nor where he has acted as attorney or counsel in any case or matter before him.

G.S.1873, c. 14, § 3, p. 264;

R.S.1913, § 1206;

C.S.1922, § 1129;

C.S.1929, § 27-503;

R.S.1943, § 24-503;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 52;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-552.